Utah statutes.
10-2-401.   Definitions -- Property owner provisions.
(1)  As used in this part:
(a)  "Affected entity" means:
(i)  a county of the first or second class in whose unincorporated area the
area proposed for annexation is located;
(ii)  a county of the third, fourth, fifth, or sixth class in whose
unincorporated area the area proposed for annexation is located, if the area
includes residents or commercial or industrial development;
(iii)  a local district under Title 17B, Limited Purpose Local Government
Entities - Local Districts, or special service district under Title 17D,
Chapter 1, Special Service District Act, whose boundary includes any part of
an area proposed for annexation;
(iv)  a school district whose boundary includes any part of an area proposed
for annexation, if the boundary is proposed to be adjusted as a result of the
annexation; and
(v)  a municipality whose boundaries are within 1/2 mile of an area proposed
for annexation.
(b)  "Annexation petition" means a petition under Section 10-2-403 proposing
the annexation to a municipality of a contiguous, unincorporated area that is
contiguous to the municipality.
(c)  "Commission" means a boundary commission established under Section
10-2-409 for the county in which the property that is proposed for annexation
is located.
(d)  "Expansion area" means the unincorporated area that is identified in an
annexation policy plan under Section 10-2-401.5 as the area that the
municipality anticipates annexing in the future.
(e)  "Feasibility consultant" means a person or firm with expertise in the
processes and economics of local government.
(f)  "Municipal selection committee" means a committee in each county composed
of the mayor of each municipality within that county.
(g)  "Private," with respect to real property, means not owned by the United
States or any agency of the federal government, the state, a county, a
municipality, a school district, a local district under Title 17B, Limited
Purpose Local Government Entities - Local Districts, a special service
district under Title 17D, Chapter 1, Special Service District Act, or any
other political subdivision or governmental entity of the state.
(h)  "Specified county" means a county of the second, third, fourth, fifth, or
sixth class.
(i)  "Township" has the same meaning as defined in Section 17-27a-103.
(j)  "Unincorporated peninsula" means an unincorporated area:
(i)  that is part of a larger unincorporated area;
(ii)  that extends from the rest of the unincorporated area of which it is a
part;
(iii)  that is surrounded by land that is within a municipality, except where
the area connects to and extends from the rest of the unincorporated area of
which it is a part; and
(iv)  whose width, at any point where a straight line may be drawn from a
place where it borders a municipality to another place where it borders a
municipality, is no more than 25% of the boundary of the area where it borders
a municipality.
(k)  "Urban development" means:
(i)  a housing development with more than 15 residential units and an average
density greater than one residential unit per acre; or
(ii)  a commercial or industrial development for which cost projections exceed
$750,000 for all phases.
(2)  For purposes of this part:
(a)  the owner of real property shall be:
(i)  except as provided in Subsection (2)(a)(ii), the record title owner
according to the records of the county recorder on the date of the filing of
the petition or protest; or
(ii)  the lessee of military land, as defined in Section 63H-1-102, if the
area proposed for annexation includes military land that is within a project
area described in a project area plan adopted by the military installation
development authority under Title 63H, Chapter 1, Military Installation
Development Authority Act; and
(b)  the value of private real property shall be determined according to the
last assessment roll for county taxes before the filing of the petition or
protest.
(3)  For purposes of each provision of this part that requires the owners of
private real property covering a percentage or majority of the total private
land area within an area to sign a petition or protest:
(a)  a parcel of real property may not be included in the calculation of the
required percentage or majority unless the petition or protest is signed by:
(i)  except as provided in Subsection (3)(a)(ii), owners representing a
majority ownership interest in that parcel; or
(ii)  if the parcel is owned by joint tenants or tenants by the entirety, 50%
of the number of owners of that parcel;
(b)  the signature of a person signing a petition or protest in a
representative capacity on behalf of an owner is invalid unless:
(i)  the person's representative capacity and the name of the owner the person
represents are indicated on the petition or protest with the person's
signature; and
(ii)  the person provides documentation accompanying the petition or protest
that substantiates the person's representative capacity; and
(c)  subject to Subsection (3)(b), a duly appointed personal representative
may sign a petition or protest on behalf of a deceased owner.
